California, session 20252026, SB428.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8544.4 of the Government Code is amended to read:8544.4. The permanent office of the California State Auditor shall be in Sacramento or within a two-mile radius of the State Capitol Building, where they shall be provided with suitable and sufficient offices. When in the California State Auditor’s judgment the conduct of the work requires, they may maintain offices at other places in the state.